Washington statutes.
RCW 14.16.030

Federal licensing of airmen or airwomen.

The public safety requiring and the advantages of uniform regulation making it desirable in the interest of aeronautical progress that a person serving as an airman or airwoman within this state should have the qualifications necessary for obtaining and holding the class of license required by the United States government with respect to such an airman or airwoman subject to its jurisdiction, it shall be unlawful for any person to serve as an airman or airwoman within this state unless he or she has such a license: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That for the first thirty days after entrance into this state this section shall not apply to nonresidents of this state operating aircraft within this state, other than aircraft carrying persons or property for hire, if such person shall have fully complied with the laws of the state, territory or foreign country of his or her residence respecting the licensing of airmen or airwomen.

[ 2010 c 8 s 5007; 1929 c 157 s 3; RRS s 2722-3.]

NOTES:

Airman and airwoman certificates required: RCW 47.68.230.

Federal aviation program: Title 49, chapter 20, U.S.C.